Washington statutes.
RCW 19.94.360

Declaration of price on outside of package.

In addition to the declarations required by RCW 19.94.350, any commodity in package form, the package being one of a lot containing random weights, measures or counts of the same commodity at the time it is exposed for sale at retail, shall bear on the outside of the package a plain and conspicuous declaration of the price per single unit of weight, measure, or count and the total selling price of the package.

[ 1995 c 355 s 18; 1969 c 67 s 36.]

NOTES:

Application—Effective dates—1995 c 355: See notes following RCW 19.94.015.